Washington statutes.
RCW 43.164.030

Reimbursement of steering committee member expenses.

Members of the steering committee must be reimbursed for travel expenses as provided in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060, as well as child care and other expenses as needed for each day a steering committee member attends meetings to provide consultative assistance to the agencies managing the economic security for all grants as provided in RCW 43.164.020 and 43.164.040, for up to 12 meetings per calendar year.

[ 2024 c 92 s 4.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2024 c 92: See note following RCW 43.164.020.